Missouri, session 2026, SB1372.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 1.202, to read as
follows:
1.202. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "No Shari'a Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms shall
mean:
(1) "Foreign law", any law, legal code, or system
derived from a jurisdiction outside the United States or its
territories, including religious law when invoked as a
substitute for a state or federal law;
(2) "Fundamental rights", rights guaranteed by the
Constitution of Missouri and the Constitution of the United
States, including, but not limited to, due process, equal
protection, freedom of religion, freedom of speech, and
rights related to marriage, child custody, and property.
3. (1) No court shall enforce a judgment, decree, or
arbitration decision if it relies, in whole or in part, on
Shari'a or any foreign law that violates the constitutional
rights of any party.

SB 1372 2
(2) A contract provision choosing foreign law shall be
valid unless enforcement would result in a violation of
constitutional rights.
(3) In matters involving marriage, divorce, child
custody, adoption, or inheritance, no court shall apply or
enforce foreign law if inconsistent with fundamental rights
or public policy.
✓